Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.080

Election method—Notice of election.

Notice of an annexation election shall particularly describe the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed, state the objects of the election as prayed in the petition or as stated in the resolution and require the voters to cast ballots which shall contain the words "For annexation" and "Against annexation" or words equivalent thereto, or contain the words "For annexation and adoption of comprehensive plan" and "Against annexation and adoption of comprehensive plan" or words equivalent thereto in case the simultaneous adoption of a comprehensive plan is proposed, and which in case the assumption of indebtedness is proposed, shall contain as a separate proposition, the words "For assumption of indebtedness" and "Against assumption of indebtedness" or words equivalent thereto and if only a portion of the indebtedness of the annexing city or town is to be assumed, an appropriate separate proposition for and against the assumption of such portion of the indebtedness shall be submitted to the voters. The notice shall be posted for at least two weeks prior to the date of election in four public places within the area proposed to be annexed and published in accordance with the notice required by RCW 29A.52.355 prior to the date of election in a newspaper of general circulation in the area proposed to be annexed.

[ 2022 c 26 s 5; 2015 c 53 s 25; 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 7; 1967 c 73 s 10; 1965 ex.s. c 88 s 6; 1965 c 7 s 35.13.080. Prior: 1961 c 282 s 13; prior: 1907 c 245 s 3, part; RRS s 8898, part.]